Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1205
Owner, defined.

Owner shall mean a person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title to a motorboat. The term shall include a person entitled to the use or possession of a motorboat subject to an interest in another person, reserved or created by agreement and securing payment or performance of an obligation, but the term shall exclude a lessee under a lease not intended as security.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 5.